Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4229.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3. (1) The office of school safety shall do all of the following: (a) In conjunction with the department of education, create model practices for school safety, including, but not limited to, engaging with local law enforcement agencies to assess school buildings for which emergency operation plans are being developed. (b) Develop and offer training to school staff on school safety. The office of school safety may contract with another party to develop and offer the training required under this subdivision. (c) In conjunction with the department of education, seek and apply for federal funds relating to school safety and reducing violence and disruption in schools, including, but not limited to, federal funding for alternative schools or programs described in section 1280a of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1280a. (d) Create and administer a grant program to disburse competitive school safety grants as appropriated by the legislature to public schools, nonpublic schools, school districts, and intermediate school districts to improve the safety and security of school buildings, students, and staff. (e) Compile quarterly reports of the tips received under section 3 of the student safety act, 2013 PA 183, MCL 752.913, and provide a copy of each report compiled under this subdivision to the school safety and mental health commission established under section 6 of the comprehensive school safety plan act, 2018 PA 548, MCL 28.806. (2) Subject to appropriation, the department of state police shall provide the office of school safety with the staff and resources necessary for the office to comply with this act. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 4258 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.